District of Columbia statutes.
41-112

Property held by public officers and agencies.

Except for property held by the Property Clerk of the Metropolitan Police Department, as provided in subchapter X of Chapter 1 of Title 5, all intangible personal property held for the owner by any public corporation, public authority, or public officer of the District government, that has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one year, is presumed abandoned.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 112, 27 DCR 5150
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1701(h), 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 42-212.
Section 1701(h) of D.C. Law 12-59 substituted “1 year” for “2 years.”
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 1701(h) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 1701(h) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).